Missouri, session 2026, SB1466.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 42.300, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 42.300,
to read as follows:
42.300. 1. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust
Fund" which shall consist of money collected under section
313.835. The state treasurer shall administer the veterans
commission capital improvement trust fund, and the moneys in
such fund shall be used solely, upon appropriation, by the
Missouri veterans commission for:
(1) The construction, maintenance or renovation or
equipment needs of veterans' homes in this state;
(2) The construction, maintenance, renovation,
equipment needs and operation of veterans' cemeteries in
this state;
(3) Fund transfers to Missouri veterans' homes fund
established under the provisions of section 42.121, as
necessary to maintain solvency of the fund;
(4) Fund transfers to any municipality with a
population greater than four hundred thousand and located in
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1466 2
part of a county with a population greater than six hundred
thousand in this state which has established a fund for the
sole purpose of the restoration, renovation and maintenance
of a memorial or museum or both dedicated to World War I.
Appropriations from the veterans commission capital
improvement trust fund to such memorial fund shall be
provided only as a one-time match for other funds devoted to
the project and shall not exceed five million dollars.
Additional appropriations not to exceed ten million dollars
total may be made from the veterans commission capital
improvement trust fund as a match to other funds for the new
construction or renovation of other facilities dedicated as
veterans' memorials in the state. All appropriations for
renovation, new construction, reconstruction, and
maintenance of veterans' memorials shall be made only for
applications received by the Missouri veterans commission
prior to July 1, 2004;
(5) The issuance of matching fund grants for veterans'
service officer programs to any federally chartered
veterans' organization or municipal government agency that
is certified by the Veterans Administration to process
veteran claims within the Veterans Administration System;
provided that such veterans' organization has maintained a
veterans' service officer presence within the state of
Missouri for the three-year period immediately preceding the
issuance of any such grant. A total of one million five
hundred thousand dollars in grants shall be made available
annually for service officers and joint training and
outreach between veterans' service organizations and the
Missouri veterans commission with grants being issued in
July of each year. Application for the matching grants
shall be made through and approved by the Missouri veterans

SB 1466 3
commission based on the requirements established by the
commission;
(6) For payment of Missouri National Guard and
Missouri veterans commission expenses associated with
providing medals, medallions and certificates in recognition
of service in the Armed Forces of the United States during
World War II, the Korean Conflict, and the Vietnam War under
sections 42.170 to 42.226. Any funds remaining from the
medals, medallions and certificates shall not be transferred
to any other fund and shall only be utilized for the
awarding of future medals, medallions, and certificates in
recognition of service in the Armed Forces;
(7) Fund transfers totaling ten million dollars to any
municipality with a population greater than three hundred
fifty thousand inhabitants and located in part in a county
with a population greater than six hundred thousand
inhabitants and with a charter form of government, for the
sole purpose of the construction, restoration, renovation
and maintenance of a memorial or museum or both dedicated to
World War I; [and]
(8) Fund transfers totaling no more than five hundred
thousand dollars, to any county with more than seventeen
thousand six hundred but fewer than twenty thousand
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than eight
thousand but fewer than ten thousand inhabitants, for the
sole purpose of the restoration, renovation, and maintenance
of a memorial or museum or both dedicated to Missouri and
United States veterans and their service; funds allocated in
section 195.820 may also be appropriated for services,
programs, or projects dedicated to addressing the mental
health needs of veterans; and

SB 1466 4
(9) The administration of the Missouri veterans
commission.
2. Any interest which accrues to the fund shall remain
in the fund and shall be used in the same manner as moneys
which are transferred to the fund under this section.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the
contrary, moneys in the veterans commission capital
improvement trust fund at the end of any biennium shall not
be transferred to the credit of the general revenue fund.
3. Upon request by the veterans commission, the
general assembly may appropriate moneys from the veterans
commission capital improvement trust fund to the Missouri
National Guard trust fund to support the activities
described in section 41.958.
✓